Hawaii statutes.
§367-4 County committees on status of
women, membership, organization, etc. The mayor of each county shall
appoint a county committee on the status of women charged with the duty and
responsibility of developing information as the state commission on the status
of women requires or as the committee deems advisable concerning the status of
women within the respective counties; and other appropriate duties and
responsibilities as may be deemed necessary by each county. The committees
shall submit to the state commission, plans and proposals affecting the status
of women in the several counties. Each county committee shall endeavor to
secure the widest possible citizen participation in its efforts and, for this
purpose, may utilize existing public or private organizations. The membership
of each county committee shall include, ex officio, the county attorney or
corporation counsel and the county representative of the commission on the
status of women. The other members shall be selected on the basis of their
interest and knowledge in, and their ability to make contributions to, the
solution of problems relating to the status of women within the county and
their knowledge of local conditions. The chairperson shall be elected annually
from the nongovernmental members of the committee. The terms of office of each
member shall be four years. Each county committee shall meet at least four
times a year. The members of the county committees shall receive no
compensation for their services. The respective county legislative bodies are
authorized to make appropriations to meet the necessary expenses of the
committees. [L 1970, c 190, pt of §1; am L 1979, c 204, §2; gen ch 1993; am L
1995, c 151, §5; am L 1996, c 298, §6]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next